Hawaii statutes.
[§11-433] Post-election report
required. The treasurer shall electronically submit an expenditure of
public funds report to the commission no later than twenty days after a primary
election and no later than thirty days after a general election certifying that
all public funds paid to the candidate have been used as required by this part.

Should the commission determine that any
portion of the public funds have been used for noncampaign or other improper
expenses, it shall report such finding to the attorney general and shall order
the candidate to return all or part of the funds paid to that candidate for a
primary or general election. When public funds are returned, the funds shall
be deposited into the Hawaii election campaign fund. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next